Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1808
Inquest; witnesses; recognizance for appearance in district court.

If the evidence of any witness shall implicate any person as the unlawful slayer of the person over whom the said inquisition shall be held, the coroner shall recognize such witness, in such sum as the coroner may think proper, to be and appear at the next term of the district court for the said county, there to give evidence of the matter in question and not depart without leave. Such recognizance shall be in the same form, as nearly as practicable, and have the same effect as recognizances taken in county court in cases of felony.

Laws 1879, § 104, p. 382;

R.S.1913, § 5670;

C.S.1922, § 5000;

C.S.1929, § 26-1509;

R.S.1943, § 23-1808;

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 114;

Laws 1979, LB 80, § 73.